src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON LOSSAT  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. a-Attr. and final t
 +A:a%> ATTR ;
 +A+Use/NG:ad%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom:i%>X4b K ;
 +A+Comp:i%>X4b ATTRCONT ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu K ;
! +A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X4b K ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu K ;
! +A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:i%>X4b K ;
 +A+Comp+Pl+Nom:i%>X4but K ;
 +A+Comp+Ess:i%>X4bun K ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:i»X4buš%> ATTRCONT ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:i»X4bužž%> K ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+SgNomCmp+Use/-Spell:i»X4bužž%> R ;			! test this
! +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+SgGenCmp:i»X4bužž%> R ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:i»X4bužža%> BUOREMUSSA- ;
 +A+Comp:i%>X4bu MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;
! +A+Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> PxSgV ; !^P^
! +A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> PxSgV ; !^P^
! +A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> PxSgV ; !^P^
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:i%>X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:i%>X4busa%> PxV ;
 +A+Comp+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:i%>X4buiddá%> Px1V ;
! +A+Superl:i%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; !Replaced to avoid adverb losimusat etc.
 +A+Superl+Attr:i%>X4mus%> K ; ! Attributive superlatives
 +A+Superl+Sg+Nom:i%>X4muss%> K ;
 +A+Superl+SgNomCmp+Use/-Spell:i%>X4muss%> R ;			! test this
 +A+Superl+SgGenCmp:i%>X4muss%> R ;
! +A+Superl:i%>X4mus VUOHTA ; !XXX Really?
 +A+Superl+Ess:i%>X4mussa%>n K ;
 +A+Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:%>ad%>epmos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:%>ad%>amos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:i%>X4mussa%> PxV ;
 +A+Superl+Ess+Use/Sub:i%>X4mussa%>n%> PxC ;
 +A+Superl:i%>X4mussa%> EABBUCASE2 ;
 +A:ad%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:ad%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +A+Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:i%>X4musat K ;
 +A+Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:i%>X4but K ;


LEXICON CAVGAT  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. a/es-Attr. and final t, both -but and -eappot comparatives
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:a%> ATTR ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:e%>Y9s ATTR ;
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:ad%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
! +A:ga%> BU/MUS ; causes adv čavggat, replaced by next two:
 +A+Comp+Dial/%-GG:ga%>b BUStem ;
 +A+Superl+Dial/%-GG:ga%>muss BUOREMUS ;
 +A:ad%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:ad%> GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON CIENAL  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Strong Grade is-Attr.
 +A:%>X2is ATTR ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;
! +A:%>X2 GARRAS- ; ! GARRAS- removed
! +A:%>X4 GARAS0 ; ! GARAS0 removed

LEXICON NJUORAS  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj., with Strong Grade a-Attr.
 +A:%> ATTR ;
 :s GAPPUS ;

LEXICON DILDDAS  !!= * __@CODE@__  ,-ld-(#=is) Trisyll Grad., facult is-Attr.
 +A+Use/NG:%>X4is ATTR ;
 GAPPUS ;

LEXICON VUOGAS  !!= * __@CODE@__  Trisyll. adj. with gradation I-III and no sep. attr.
 +A:%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;
 +A:%>Y9 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:%>Y9 EABBO/EAMOS ;

LEXICON HEAHKAS  !!= * __@CODE@__  ,-hkk-#=is heahkka Trisyll Grad., is-Attr & heahkka
 +A:%>X4sis ATTR ;
 GARAS ;

LEXICON EATTAS  !!= * __@CODE@__  ,-dd-#=is Trisyll. Grad. C-Adj. with WeG is-Attr.
 +A:%>X4is ATTR ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON BOAKKAS  !!= * __@CODE@__  ,-gg-#boagge9- Trisyll
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;


LEXICON FARGAT  !!= * __@CODE@__  :d#Ø Trisyll
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%> MALLASadj- ;
 +A:%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +A+SgNomCmp+Use/-Spell:»X7# NAMAT ;    ! Removing the #, it prevents these forms
!+A+SgNomCmp#:»X7# NAMAT ;  ! from being let through lookup2cg.


LEXICON GAPPUS  !!= * __@CODE@__  -bbo- Trisyll
 +A:%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON VATTIS  !!= * __@CODE@__  Trisyll CG, -es/-is Attr
 +A:%>W1 ATTR ;
 +A+Use/Sub:%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON BIEKKUS  !!= * __@CODE@__  ,-iggo-#=is Trisyll Grad, is-Attr,
 +A:%>X4is ATTR ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON LIEKKUS  !!= * __@CODE@__  ,-iggo-(#=is)
 +A:%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A+Use/NG:%>X4is ATTR ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON GUOROS !!= * __@CODE@__  
 +A:%>W1 ATTR ;
 +A+Ess:%>W1in K ;
 +A+Sg+Nom:%>W1 K ;
 +A:%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;


LEXICON NUOLUS  !!= * __@CODE@__  ,-u8llo-(#nuolo9s)
 +A:%>W1 ATTR ;
 +A+Use/Sub:%>X4 ATTR ; ! nuolus
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;


LEXICON GEARGGUS  !!= * __@CODE@__  ,-ergo-#gearggo9s
 +A:%>W1 ATTR ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON VUDDJII!!= * __@CODE@__  
 +A:%>Y5s ATTR ;
 +A+SgNomCmp+Use/-Spell:%>jW1 R ;
 +A:%>j GAPPUS0 ; ! also VUOHTA, but with j
 +A+Use/-Spell: VUOHTA ;  ! VUOHTA, without j
 +A:%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 
LEXICON VUDDJII_DECLINED  !!= * __@CODE@__ misses most cases
 +A:%>Y5s ATTR ;
 +A+SgNomCmp+Use/-Spell:%>jW1 R ;
 +A:%>j GAPPUS0 ; ! also VUOHTA, but with j
 +A+Use/-Spell: VUOHTA ;  ! VUOHTA, without j
 +A:%>Y5 VUDDJI- ; !replaced by the 3 following indivudual pointers
 +A+Sg+Acc:%>Y5 K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>Y5t K ;
 +A+Pl+Acc:%>Y5jd K ;


 LEXICON JIEDNAI !!= * __@CODE@__  
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:%>jit K ;
 +A:%>Q3s ATTR ;
 +A+SgNomCmp+Use/-Spell:%>jW1 R ;
 +A:%>j GAPPUS0 ; ! VUOHTA j
 +A+Use/-Spell+Use/Sub: VUOHTA ;  ! VUOHTA, no j
 +A:%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +A+Comp:%>Y5b BUStem ;
 +A+Superl:%>Y5muss BUOREMUS ;
 
 LEXICON JIEDNAI_DECLINED  !!= * __@CODE@__ misses most cases
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:%>jit K ;
 +A:%>Q3s ATTR ;
 +A+SgNomCmp+Use/-Spell:%>jW1 R ;
 +A:%>j GAPPUS0 ; ! VUOHTA j
 +A+Use/-Spell+Use/Sub: VUOHTA ;  ! VUOHTA, no j
! +A:%>Y5 VUDDJI- ; !replaced by the 3 following indivudual pointers
 +A+Sg+Acc:%>Y5 K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>Y5t K ;
 +A+Pl+Acc:%>Y5jd K ;
 +A+Comp:%>Y5b BUStem ;
 +A+Superl:%>Y5muss BUOREMUS ;

LEXICON BOARIS  !!= * __@CODE@__  As GAPPUS, but with different attr.
 +A:%>W1s ATTR ;
 +A:s%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:s%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:s%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;
 
LEXICON BOARIS_NOCOMP !!= * __@CODE@__ !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A:%>W1s ATTR ;
! +A:s%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:s%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 +A:s%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;



LEXICON AKTIIVA
 +A:%> ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;

LEXICON BOREALA  !!= * __@CODE@__ AKTIIVA without comparatives
 +A:%> ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;

LEXICON SPANSKA !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A:skka%> ATTR ;
 +A:s'ka%> GOAHTI-OBLadj ;
 +A+Sg+Nom:s'ka%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:s'ka%> Px3V ;
 +A+SgNomCmp+Use/Sub: R ;
 +A+Ess:n K ;
