src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Eahpe_Adjective
eahpevárddus+CmpN/First:eahpe#vár'dus NUOLUS ;
eahpenjuolgat+CmpN/First:eahpe#njuolg CAVGAT ;
LEXICON Adjective
antisosiála+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:anti#sosi^ála AKTIIVA ;
biekkus:bieggus BIEKKUS "windy A" ;
bieđut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bieđuh FARGAT ;
bollui:bollo VUDDJII_DECLINED "buttony A" ;
borastuhkis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:borastuhkkis GAPPUS ;
báljis:bállji BOARIS ;
ceakkonjuolgat:ceakko7#njuolg CAVGAT ;
ceakkus:ceaggus BOAKKAS ;
cirkumpolára:cirkum9#polára BOREALA ;
deavis:deavvis VATTIS ;
dielvvis:diel'vi BOARIS ;
doavkkas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:doav'kas DILDDAS ;
doaŋggas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:doaŋ'gas EATTAS ;
máilmmidovddus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:má#ilmmi#dov'dus GAPPUS ;
dumpái+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dumpá JIEDNAI ;
dumsui:dumso JIEDNAI_DECLINED ;
duolmmus:duolbmus GEARGGUS ;
duŋggas:duŋ'ga HEAHKAS ;
dávggas:dáv'gas EATTAS ;
ealus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:eallus BIEKKUS ;
eksponentiála:eksponenti^ála BOREALA ;
ekstensiiva:ekstensij'va AKTIIVA ;
fargat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fargad FARGAT ;
faŋkkas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:faŋ'kas BOAKKAS ;
gavvar:gav'var CIENAL ;
geahppat:geahpp LOSSAT ;
gearggus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gear'gus GEARGGUS "ready A" ;
geniála+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:geni^ála AKTIIVA ;
gielddus:giel'dus GEARGGUS ;
givas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:givvas EATTAS ;
goahkkái:goahkká JIEDNAI_DECLINED ;
gonagasivdnenjuolgat:gonagas#ivdne#njuolg CAVGAT ;
guoibmái+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guojbmá JIEDNAI ;
guoros:guorro7s GUOROS ;
guvnnjas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guvdnjas BOAKKAS ;
gáiddus:gáj'dus GAPPUS ;
gáldoprojektionála:gáldo#projektionála BOREALA ;
gálggus:gál'gus NUOLUS ;
beallegárvvis:bealle#gár'vi BOARIS ;
gávkkas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gáv'kas EATTAS ;
heahkas:heahkka HEAHKAS "surprising A" ;
huvvái+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:huvvá JIEDNAI ;
háissas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:háj'sa HEAHKAS ;
hánis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hátnis VATTIS ;
iešsihkar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ieš#sihkar CIENAL ;
individuála:individu^ála AKTIIVA ;
intentionála:intentionála BOREALA ;
itkkus:it'kus BIEKKUS ;
ivdnenjuolgat:ivdne#njuolg CAVGAT ;
jierbmái+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jierbmá JIEDNAI ;
jogŋái:jogŋá JIEDNAI_DECLINED ;
juorbbas:juor'bas EATTAS ;
knáhpis:knáhppi HEAHKAS ;
guorus+Use/Sub:kuorrus GEARGGUS ;
lavttis:lak'tis BOAKKAS ;
libmii:libme VUDDJII_DECLINED ;
liekkus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lieggus LIEKKUS "warm A" ;
lossat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:loss LOSSAT ;
luossabiebmanfriija:luossa#biebman#friija AKTIIVA ;
luotkkus:luot'kus GEARGGUS ;
luovos+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:luovvo7s GUOROS ;
lutherána+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lutherána BOREALA; !
láittas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:láj'tas DILDDAS ;
lámis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lápmis VATTIS ;
láskkonjuolgat:láskko7#njuolg CAVGAT ;
láđas:láđđas GAPPUS ;
mieiggus:miej'gus BIEKKUS ;
mievkkis:miev'ki BOARIS ;
moallái:moallá JIEDNAI_DECLINED ;
mukkas:muggas BOAKKAS ;
navggas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nav'gas DILDDAS ;
nivssas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nik'sas EATTAS ;
njoaiddus:njoaj'dus GEARGGUS ;
njuolgat:njuolg CAVGAT ;
njuoras+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njuorra NJUORAS "tender A" ;
nollas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nol'las BOAKKAS ;
nuolus:nuollus NUOLUS ;
nálggas:nál'ga HEAHKAS ;
námas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:námmas DILDDAS ;
oaivilámis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oaivi7#lápmis VATTIS ;
ovttadimensionála:ovtta#dimensionála AKTIIVA ;
pivlii+Use/LexSub:pivle VUDDJII_DECLINED ;
prosentuála:prosentu^ála BOREALA ;
roattus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:roaddus LIEKKUS ;
rossái+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rossá JIEDNAI ;
ruhtahánis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruhta#hátnis VATTIS ;
ruobbecoagis:ruobbe7#coah'ki BOARIS ;
ruojus:ruod'jus NUOLUS ;
ruvsui:ruvso JIEDNAI_DECLINED ;
ruškesránis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruškes#rátni BOARIS_NOCOMP ;
rábmii:rábme VUDDJII_DECLINED ;
rákkis:rággis GAPPUS ;
ráđas:ráđđa NJUORAS ;
ráđus:ráđđus GEARGGUS ;
sealbbus:seal'bus NUOLUS ;
seriøsa:seri^øsa AKTIIVA ;
siddjii:siddje VUDDJII_DECLINED ;
sihkar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+v1:sihkkar CIENAL "sure A" ; ! alternating forms hk ~ hkk
silbaránis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:silba#rátni BOARIS_NOCOMP ;
siđŋŋas:siđgŋas BOAKKAS ;
skieras+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:skierras EATTAS ;
sneavvar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sneav'var CIENAL ;
snoakkis:snoaggi HEAHKAS ;
soahtelámis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:soahte7#lápmis VATTIS ;
spánska+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:spán SPANSKA ;
ránska+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:rán SPANSKA ;
fránska+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:frán SPANSKA ;
dánska+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:dán SPANSKA ;
stoaiddas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stoaj'da NJUORAS ;
stoaljas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stoalljas EATTAS ;
stávrras+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stáv'ras BOAKKAS ;
sudnii:sudne VUDDJII_DECLINED ;
suhppái:suhppá JIEDNAI_DECLINED ;
doaladahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:doaladahkke7s GAPPUS ;
suohtas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:suohttas DILDDAS ;
suokkis:suoggi BOARIS ;
suovat:suovad FARGAT ;
hubmái+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hubmá JIEDNAI ;
transitiiva:transitij'va BOREALA ;
veađar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:veađđar CIENAL ;
vilddus:vil'dus BIEKKUS ;
viŋkilnjuolgat:viŋkil#njuolg CAVGAT ;
vuddjii:vuddje VUDDJII_DECLINED "fat A" ;
vuogas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuoh'kas VUOGAS ;
vuoitosihkar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuoito#sihkkar CIENAL ;
vuonjas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuonjas DILDDAS ;
vuoŋis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuokŋi BOARIS ;
vádjet:vádjeg DILDDAS ;
vádjit:vádjig DILDDAS ;
várddus+Use/Sub:vár'dus LIEKKUS ;
várddus:vár'dus NUOLUS ;
ámmátsuorgái:ámmát#suorgá JIEDNAI_DECLINED ;
ávdái+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ávdá JIEDNAI ;
čagaldahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čagaldahkke7s GAPPUS ;
čahkas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čahkka NJUORAS ;
čavgat:čavg CAVGAT ;
čielgelámis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čielge7#lámis VATTIS ;
čieŋal:čiekŋal CIENAL ;
čálggas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čál'ga NJUORAS ;
šearus:šearrus BIEKKUS ;
jiešsihkar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jieš#sihkar CIENAL ;
